Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1538
Fraudulent assistance of illiterate voter; penalty.

Any person who, with intent to induce a voter who cannot read to vote contrary to his or her inclination, furnishes the voter with a ballot and informs him or her that the ballot contains a name or names different from the name or names which are written or printed on the ballot or who fraudulently or deceitfully changes a ballot of any voter so that such voter is prevented from voting for the candidate or candidates as he or she intended shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 437.